Tennessee, session 114, SB2427.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-127(e), is amended by deleting
the subsection and substituting:
(e) To be eligible to receive a medication aide certificate, an applicant must:
(1) Be at least eighteen (18) years of age;
(2) Have completed the twelfth grade or its equivalent, or have
successfully passed the test for and received a high school equivalency
credential approved by the state board of education;
(3) Have successfully completed a course of instruction provided by a
training program approved by the board under subsection (i);
(4) Have passed a standardized knowledge and skill examination within
a maximum of two (2) attempts; and
(5) Meet one (1) of the following criteria:
(A) Have practiced as a certified nurse aide for at least one (1)
year in a nursing home, assisted-care living facility, or a program for all-
inclusive care for the elderly (PACE), as defined in § 56-2-121(b);
(B) Have practiced as a licensed occupational therapy assistant
for at least one (1) year in a nursing home, assisted-care living facility, or
a PACE, as defined in § 56-2-121(b); or
(C) Be a student in good standing enrolled in an approved school
of nursing, as defined by the board of nursing.
SB2427
012056
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-127, is amended by deleting
subsection (f) and substituting:
(f)
(1) If an applicant meets the requirements of subsection (e), then the
board shall issue a medication aide certificate to the applicant.
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (e), the board shall issue a medication
aide certificate to an applicant meeting the following alternative criteria for
nursing school students:
(A) The applicant is a student in good standing enrolled in an
approved school of nursing, as defined by the board of nursing; and
(B) Has completed courses providing education regarding the
basic nursing fundamentals and foundations, basic pharmacology, and
medication administration portions of the nursing program with a sufficient
passing grade.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-127(i)(2), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(C) Arrangements to ensure a class of students completes the program in a
minimum of fourteen (14) days but a maximum of ninety (90) days from the start date of
the class.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-127(l), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(3) Any rules adopted regarding the evaluation of a program's overall test taker
examination pass rate must base the calculation on the number of students who
successfully pass the standardized knowledge and skill examination within two (2)
- 2 - 012056

attempts regardless of whether a candidate passes on the candidate's first or second
attempt.
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 63-7-127, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(o)
(1) The board, at its discretion, may grant certification to a person as a
medication aide if:
(A) The person is certified, licensed, or registered and in good
standing in another state as a medication aide, or an equivalent title; and
(B) The requirements for approval in such other state are as
stringent as required by this section.
(2) The board is authorized to adopt rules regarding the administrative
process for an individual to obtain certification as a medication aide pursuant to
this subsection (o). Such rules may delegate to administrative staff of the board
of nursing the authority to approve an application from a person meeting the
requirements of this subsection (o). The rules must be promulgated in
accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4,
chapter 5.
SECTION 6. For the purposes of promulgating rules, this act takes effect upon
becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it. For all other purposes, this act takes effect July
1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 012056